Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202385-3210
Act; limitations.

The Door to College Scholarship Act does not grant any authority to the commission to:

(1) Control or influence the policies of any eligible postsecondary educational institution because such institution accepts students who receive awards; or

(2) Require any eligible postsecondary educational institution to enroll any student receiving an award or, once admitted, to permit continued enrollment in such institution by any student receiving an award.

Laws 2023, LB705, § 37.